Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; YOUTH WATER SAFETY.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of education for a water safety grant program. The commissioner of education must allocate grants to eligible applicants. Eligible applicants include nonprofit organizations and city and county parks and recreation programs that provide swimming lessons to youth. Eligible applicants are not required to partner with other entities. Grant money must be primarily used to provide scholarships to low-income and at-risk children for swimming lessons. Up to 15 percent of the grant money may also be used to hire water safety instructors or lifeguards or to train water safety instructors or lifeguards in nationally recognized water safety practices and instruction. new text end